California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) The notice of good faith possession shall contain all of the following information:

(A) The date of the good faith possession.

(B) The name and contact information of the junk dealer or recycler that has acquired good faith possession of the merchandise pallets.

(C) The location of where the merchandise pallets are held.

(D) The number of merchandise pallets acquired.

(E) The date on or after which the merchandise pallets will be deemed relinquished to the junk dealer or recycler.

(2) The notice of
 good faith possession shall be shall be sent by mail or email to the indicated owner at the indicated owner’s physical or email address, if known.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bulk merchandise pallets” means plastic or wood containers, carriers, or holders used by a manufacturer or distributor for bulk transport of merchandise to wholesale or retail outlets.

(2) “Indicia of ownership” means words, symbols, or registered trademarks printed, stamped, etched, attached, or otherwise displayed on the exterior surface of the merchandise pallet that reasonably identifies the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21610.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) For the purposes of this section, the term “core recycler” means a person or business, including a recycler or junk dealer, that buys used individual catalytic converters, transmissions, or other parts previously removed from a vehicle. A person or business that buys a vehicle that may contain these parts is not a core recycler.

(2) “Commercial enterprise” includes any of the following:

(A) An automobile dismantler licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of
 Division 5 of the Vehicle Code.

(B) A core recycler that maintains a fixed place of business for the purpose of obtaining catalytic converters pursuant to this section.

(C) A motor vehicle manufacturer, dealer, or lessor-retailer licensed pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) of the Vehicle Code.

(D) An automotive repair dealer licensed pursuant to Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) of Division 3.

(E) Any other licensed business that may reasonably generate, possess, or sell used catalytic converters.

(b) A core recycler who accepts a catalytic converter for recycling
 shall maintain a written record that contains all of the following:

(1) The place and date of each sale or purchase of a catalytic converter made in the conduct of their business as a core recycler.

(2) The name, valid driver’s license number, and state of issue, or California-issued identification number, of the seller of the catalytic converter and the vehicle license number, including state of issue of a motor vehicle used in transporting the catalytic converter to the core recycler’s place of business. If the seller is a commercial enterprise, the written record shall include the name, physical business address, business telephone number, and the business license number or tax identification number of the commercial enterprise.

(3) A description of the catalytic converters purchased or sold, including the item type and quantity, amount paid for the catalytic converter, and identification number, if any, and the year, make, model, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed.

(4) A statement indicating either that the seller of the catalytic converter is the owner of the catalytic converter, or the name of the person from whom the seller obtained the catalytic converter, including the business, if applicable, as shown on a signed transfer document.

(5) If applicable, a copy of the title of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter accepted was removed that shows the vehicle identification number matches the number permanently marked on
 the catalytic converter.

(c) A core recycler engaged in the selling or shipping of used catalytic converters to other recyclers or smelters shall retain information on the sale that includes all of the following:

(1) The name and address of each person to whom the catalytic converter is sold or disposed of.

(2) The quantity of catalytic converters being sold or shipped.

(3) The amount that was paid for the catalytic converters sold in the transaction.

(4) The date of the transaction.

(d) A core recycler shall not provide payment for a
 catalytic converter unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The payment is made by check, credit card, or any other traceable form of payment other than cash, and provided to the seller by either of the following:

(A) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), mailed to the seller at the address provided pursuant to paragraph (3).

(ii) For a seller that is a commercial enterprise, mailed to the seller’s business address.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), collected by the seller from the recycler on the third business day after the date of sale.

(ii) A seller that is a commercial enterprise may receive immediate payment by check or by debit card or credit card.

(2) At the time of sale, the core recycler obtains a clear photograph or video of the seller.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the core recycler obtains a copy of the valid driver’s license of the seller or the seller’s agent containing a photograph and an address of the seller or the seller’s agent, or a copy of a state or federal government-issued identification card containing a photograph and an address of the seller or the seller’s agent.

(B) If the seller prefers to have the check for the catalytic converter mailed to an alternative address, other than a post
 office box, the core recycler shall obtain a copy of a driver’s license or identification card described in subparagraph (A) and a gas or electric utility bill addressed to the seller at the alternative address with a payment due date no more than two months prior to the date of sale. For the purpose of this subparagraph, “alternative address” means an address that is different from the address appearing on the seller’s driver’s license or identification card.

(4) The core recycler obtains a clear photograph or video of the catalytic converter being sold. If applicable, the photograph or video shall capture the permanent marking of the vehicle identification number.

(5) At the time of sale, the core recycler obtains a written statement from the seller indicating how the seller
 obtained the catalytic converter.

(6) The seller is a person described in Section 10852.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) The requirements of subdivision (d) shall not apply to a core recycler that buys used catalytic converters, transmissions, or other parts removed from a vehicle if the core recycler and the seller have a written agreement for the transaction, provided that the written agreement includes a log or other regularly updated record of all catalytic converters received pursuant to the agreement that describes each catalytic converter with sufficient particularity, including any identification numbers or markings, so that each of those catalytic converters in the core recycler’s inventory can reasonably be matched to its description in the agreement.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), core recyclers accepting catalytic converters from commercial enterprises who hold a written agreement with a business that sells catalytic converters for recycling purposes are required to collect only the following information:

(1) Name of seller or agent acting on behalf of the seller.

(2) The seller’s physical business address and business telephone number.

(3) The seller’s business license number or tax identification number.

(4) Date of transaction.

(5) Number of catalytic converters received
 in the course of the transaction.

(6) Amount of money that was paid for catalytic converters in the course of the transaction.

(7) A copy of the written agreement.

(g) A core recycler shall keep and maintain the information required pursuant to this section for not less than two years.

(h) A core recycler shall make the information required pursuant to this section available for inspection by local law enforcement upon demand.

(i) A person who makes, or causes to be made, a false or fictitious statement regarding any information required pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(j) A person who violates the requirements of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(k) Upon conviction, a person who knowingly and willfully violates the requirements of this section shall be punished as follows:

(1) For a first conviction, by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) (A) For a second conviction, by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(B) In addition to the fine imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A), the court may order the defendant to cease engaging in the business of a core recycler for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(3) (A) For a third and subsequent conviction, by a fine of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(B) In addition to the fine imposed pursuant to subparagraph (A), the court shall order the defendant to cease engaging in the business of a core recycler for a period not less than one year.

(l) The provisions of this section apply to core recyclers and do not apply to a subsequent purchaser of a catalytic converter who is not a core recycler. Other than subdivisions (f) to (j), inclusive, this section does not apply to a core recycler who holds a written agreement with a commercial enterprise regarding the transactions, provided that the written agreement includes a log or other regularly updated
 record of all catalytic converters received pursuant to the agreement that describes each catalytic converter with sufficient particularity, including any identification numbers or markings, so that each of those catalytic converters in the core recycler’s inventory can reasonably be matched to its description in the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 858, Sec. 1.   (SB 55)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Tangible Personal Property [21625. - 21647.]

21625.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to curtail the dissemination of stolen property and to facilitate the recovery of stolen property by means of a uniform, statewide, state-administered program of regulation of persons whose principal business is the buying, selling, trading, auctioning, or taking in pawn of tangible personal property and to aid the State Board of Equalization to detect possible sales tax evasion.

Further, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to require the uniform statewide reporting of tangible personal property acquired by persons whose principal business is the buying, selling, trading, auctioning, or taking in pawn of tangible personal property, unless the property or the transaction is specifically exempt herein, for the purpose of correlating these reports with other reports of city, county, and city and county law enforcement agencies and further utilizing the services of the Department of Justice to aid in tracing and recovering stolen property.

Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that this article shall not be superseded or supplanted by the provisions of any ordinance or charter of any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21626.

(a) A “secondhand dealer,” as used in this article, means and includes any person, copartnership, firm, or corporation whose business includes buying, selling, trading, taking in pawn, accepting for sale on consignment, accepting for auctioning, or auctioning secondhand tangible personal property. A “secondhand dealer” does not include a “coin dealer” or participants at gun shows or events, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, who are not required to be licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code, who are acting in compliance with the requirements of Sections 26500 to 26585, inclusive, and 27545 of the Penal Code, and who are not a “Gun Show Trader,” as
 described in Sections 16620 and 26525 of the Penal Code.

(b) As used in this section, a “coin dealer” means any person, firm, partnership, or corporation whose principal business is the buying, selling, and trading of coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, or silver, or other precious metals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 15.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

21626.5.

“Secondhand dealer,” as used in this article, does not include either of the following:

(a) Any person who performs the services of an auctioneer for a fee or salary.

(b) Any person whose business is limited to the reconditioning and selling of major household appliances, provided all the following conditions are met:

(1) The person does not trade, take in pawn, accept for drop-off, accept as a trade-in, accept for sale on consignment, accept for auction, auction, or buy, except in bulk, the appliances.

(2) The person does not perform repair services for owners of appliances unless the appliance was purchased from the person.

(3) The person has never been convicted of the crime of attempting to receive or receiving stolen property or any other theft-related crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21627.

(a) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” means all secondhand tangible personal property that bears a serial number or personalized initials or inscription or that, at the time it is acquired by the secondhand dealer, bears evidence of having had a serial number or personalized initials or inscription.

(b) “Tangible personal property” also means the following:

(1) All tangible personal property, new or used, including motor vehicles, received in pledge as security for a loan by a pawnbroker.

(2) All tangible personal property that bears a serial number
 or personalized initials or inscription and that is purchased by a secondhand dealer or a pawnbroker or that, at the time of the purchase, bears evidence of having had a serial number or personalized initials or inscription.

(3) All tangible personal property that the Attorney General statistically determines through the most recent Department of Justice crime data, updated pursuant to Section 13010 of the Penal Code, to constitute a significant class of stolen goods. A list of that personal property shall be supplied by the Attorney General to all local law enforcement agencies and posted on the Attorney General’s Internet Web site. That list shall be updated annually by the Attorney General, beginning January 1, 2016, to ensure that it addresses current problems with stolen goods.

(c) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” does not include any new goods or merchandise purchased from a bona fide manufacturer or distributor or wholesaler of the new goods or merchandise by a secondhand dealer. For the purposes of this article, however, a secondhand dealer shall retain for one year from the date of purchase, and shall make available for inspection by any law enforcement officer, any receipt, invoice, bill of
 sale, or other evidence of purchase of the new goods or merchandise.

(d) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” does not include coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals. “Commercial grade ingots” means 0.99 fine or finer ingots of gold, silver, palladium, or platinum, or 0.925 fine sterling silver art bars and medallions, provided that the ingots, art bars, and medallions are marked by the refiner or fabricator as to their assay fineness.

(e) For purposes of this article, a “significant class of stolen goods” means those items determined through the Department of Justice’s most recent OpenJustice Web portal update to constitute more than 10 percent of property reported stolen in the calendar year
 preceding the annual posting of the list of significant classes of stolen goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 3.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21627.5.

“CAPSS” means the California Pawn and SecondhandDealer System, which is a single, statewide, uniform electronic reporting system that receives secondhand dealer reports and is operated by the Department of Justice consistent with Resolution Chapter 16 of the Statutes of 2010. The maintenance and operation of CAPSS is funded by the Secondhand Dealer and Pawnbroker Fund established pursuant to Section 21642.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   (AB 1751)   Effective September 29, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21628.

(a) Every secondhand dealer or coin dealer described in Section 21626 shall report daily, or no later than the next business day excluding weekends and holidays after receipt or purchase of secondhand tangible personal property, to the California Pawn and SecondhandDealer System (CAPSS), all secondhand tangible personal property, except for firearms, which they have purchased, taken in trade, taken in pawn, accepted for sale on consignment, or accepted for auctioning, in accordance with Section 21630 and this section. The report shall be legible, prepared in English, completed where applicable, and include the information specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), as applicable.

(1) (A) A property description. The property description shall be a complete and reasonably accurate description of the property, including, but not limited to, the following: serial number, personalized inscriptions, and other identifying marks or symbols, owner-applied numbers, the size, color, material, and, if known by the secondhand dealer, the manufacturer’s pattern name. The property description shall include the brand and model name or number of the item if known to, or reasonably ascertainable by, the secondhand dealer. The property description shall include a plain text description of the item generally accepted by the secondhand industry. Watches need not be disassembled when special skill or special tools are required to obtain the required information, unless specifically requested to do so by a peace
 officer. A special tool does not include a penknife, caseknife, or similar instrument and disassembling a watch with a penknife, caseknife, or similar instrument does not constitute a special skill. In all instances where the required information may be obtained by removal of a watchband, then the watchband shall be removed. The cost associated with opening the watch shall be borne by the pawnbroker, secondhand dealer, or customer.

(B) A secondhand dealer shall utilize in the article field either an article field descriptor, the format of which shall be provided by the Department of Justice, or a properly spelled and non-abbreviated plain text descriptor commonly recognized and utilized by the pawn and secondhand dealer industry. The lack of an article field descriptor provided by the Department of Justice shall not be
 relevant to any determination as to whether the secondhand dealer has received evidence of authority to sell or pledge the property pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) so long as the secondhand dealer reports an article field descriptor consistent with this subdivision.

(C) In the case of the receipt or purchase of a handheld electronic device by a secondhand dealer, the serial number reported pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be the International Mobile Station Equipment Identity (IMEI), the mobile equipment identifier (MEID), or other unique identifying number assigned to that device by the device manufacturer. If none of these identifying numbers are available by the time period required for reporting pursuant to this subdivision, the report shall be updated with the IMEI, MEID, or other unique identifying number assigned to that
 device by the device manufacturer as soon as reasonably possible but no later than 10 working days after receipt or purchase of the handheld electronic device.

(D) For the purpose of this paragraph, “handheld electronic device” means any portable device that is capable of creating, receiving, accessing, or storing electronic data or communications and includes, but is not limited to, a cellular phone, smartphone, or tablet.

(2) A report submitted by a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall be deemed to have been accepted by the Department of Justice if a good faith effort has been made to supply all of the required information. An error or omission on the report shall be noted, and the reporting pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall be notified of the error or
 omission by the Department of Justice. A reporting pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall have three business days from that notice to amend or correct the report before being subject to any enforcement violation.

(b) (1) When a secondhand dealer complies with this section, they shall be deemed to have received from the seller or pledger adequate evidence of authority to sell or pledge the property for all purposes included in this article, and Division 8 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Financial Code.

(2) In enacting this subdivision, it is the intent of the Legislature that its provisions shall not adversely affect the implementation of, or prosecution under, any provision of the Penal Code.

(c) Any person who conducts business as a secondhand dealer at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, outside the jurisdiction that issued the secondhand dealer license in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 21641, may be required to submit a duplicate of the transaction report prepared pursuant to this section to the local law enforcement agency where the gun show or event is conducted.

(d) (1) The Department of Justice shall recognize and accept the properly spelled and non-abbreviated plain text property descriptors generally accepted in the pawn and secondhand industries provided by pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, as has been the longstanding practice of chiefs of police and sheriffs when they had received paper reports
 from pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers.

(2) A report required of a secondhand dealer pursuant to this section shall be transmitted by electronic means to CAPSS by the secondhand dealer.

(3) Unless specifically identified in this section, the Department of Justice, chiefs of police, and sheriffs shall not require a secondhand dealer to include any additional information concerning the seller, the pledger, or the property received by the secondhand dealer in the report required by this section.

(4) If there is a future change to the reporting requirements of CAPSS that substantively alters the reporting standards provided by this article, those changes shall be implemented and operated in compliance with the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). In implementing and operating a future change to CAPSS, the Department of Justice, chiefs of police, and sheriffs shall comply with Sections 21637 and 21638. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice shall not take any action with respect to the implementation, operation, or maintenance of CAPSS required by this chapter by adoption of an emergency regulation.

(5) On or before July 1, 2017, the Department of Justice shall convene a meeting with the Department of Technology to discuss issues pertaining to any proposed changes or upgrades to CAPSS required by this chapter. The Department of Technology may provide technological assistance for ongoing improvements, updates, or changes to
 CAPSS required by this chapter, as requested.

(6) A coin dealer shall report the information required by this section under the reporting standard described in paragraph (1) on a form developed by the Attorney General that the coin dealer shall transmit each day by facsimile transmission or by mail to the chief of police or sheriff. A transaction shall consist of not more than one item.

(7) For purposes of this subdivision, “item” shall mean any single physical article. However, with respect to a commonly accepted grouping of articles that are purchased as a set, including, but not limited to, a pair of earrings or place settings of china, silverware, or other tableware, “item” shall mean that commonly accepted grouping.

(8) This subdivision does not exempt a secondhand dealer from the fingerprinting requirement of this section.

(e) (1) Each secondhand dealer or coin dealer, as defined in Section 21626, shall record and maintain the identification of the intended seller or pledger for three years from the date the item was reported to CAPSS. The identification of the seller or pledger of the property shall be verified by the person taking the information, who may use technology, including, but not limited to, cameras or software, or both, to obtain information and verify identity remotely. The verification shall be valid if the person taking the information reasonably relies on any one of the following documents, provided that the document is currently valid or has been issued within five years and contains a
 photograph or description, or both, of the person named on it, and, where applicable, is signed by the person, and bears a serial or other identifying number:

(A) A passport of the United States.

(B) A driver’s license issued by any state or Canada.

(C) An identification card issued by any state.

(D) An identification card issued by the United States.

(E) A passport from any other country in addition to another item of identification bearing an address.

(F) A Matricula Consular, in addition to another item of identification bearing an
 address.

(2) Each secondhand dealer or coin dealer, as defined in Section 21626, shall also record and maintain a certification by the intended seller or pledger that the person is the owner of the property or has the authority of the owner to sell or pledge the property, and a legible fingerprint taken from the intended seller or pledger.

(3) (A) If local law enforcement notifies the secondhand dealer or coin dealer, pursuant to Section 21647 of this code or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, that the item from the intended seller or pledger has been reported lost, stolen, or embezzled, the secondhand dealer or coin dealer shall provide law enforcement the information recorded as required by this
 subdivision immediately upon request or no later than the next business day.

(B) The required fields on CAPSS, which would otherwise be used to identify the intended seller or pledger of the property, shall instead be populated by “on file,” and the information on that person’s identity shall be recorded and maintained as required by this subdivision.

(f) This section does not exempt a person licensed as a firearms dealer pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code from the reporting requirements for the delivery of firearms pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(g) This section shall
 become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 185, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (SB 1317)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21628.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the “department” shall mean the Department of Justice.

(b) Every secondhand dealer described in Section 21626 shall, in a format prescribed by the department, and on the day of the transaction, electronically report to the department each firearm purchased, taken in trade, taken in pawn, accepted for sale on consignment, or accepted for auctioning. The secondhand dealer shall retain a copy of the report submitted to the department and make it available for inspection by the department, any peace officer, or any local law enforcement employee who is authorized by Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of
 Part 6 of the Penal Code to inspect a firearms transaction record.

(c) The department may retain secondhand dealer reports to determine whether a firearm taken in by a secondhand dealer has been reported lost or stolen. If the department’s records indicate that the firearm is lost or stolen, the department shall notify the law enforcement agency that entered the information in the department’s records and a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the secondhand dealer’s business location about the status of the firearm. The Dealers’ Record of Sale shall be retained by the department pursuant to Section 11106 of the Penal Code.

(d) All information in the secondhand dealer report of each firearm described in subdivision (a) shall be electronically provided by the department to the secure mailbox of the local law enforcement agency described in Section 21630 within one working
 day of receipt by the department.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 17) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21628.3.

In complying with the requirements of Section 21628, a secondhand dealer shall verify the identification of the seller or pledger for each transaction, not for each item that shall be reported.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 749, Sec. 2.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21628.5.

(a) Every business machine dealer shall report all used business machines which he has purchased, taken in trade, or accepted for sale or consignment, from an individual, to the chief of police or to the sheriff in accordance with the provisions of Section 21628 and Section 21630.

Every business machine dealer shall report all used business machines which he has repaired, if required to do so by the chief of police or the sheriff in accordance with the provisions of Section 21628 and Section 21630.

No report of repair shall be required from a dealer servicing or repairing a machine in the possession of the owner to whom that dealer sold that machine when it was new.

(b) As used in this section, the term “business machines” includes, but is not limited to, typewriters, adding machines, check-writing devices, cash registers, calculators, addressing machines, copying and accounting equipment, letter-sorting and folding devices, and recording equipment, but does not include office furniture or fixtures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1344.)
-------------------------------------------

21629.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any tangible personal property which has been:

(a) Acquired from another secondhand dealer; provided the secondhand dealer selling or trading the tangible personal property states in writing under penalty of perjury, along with a description of the property, on an interdealer transfer form or an itemized bill of sale, that the report or reports required by this article have been properly made and submitted by that dealer. A copy of the form or the itemized bill of sale shall be delivered to the acquiring dealer at the time the transaction occurs. Interdealer transfer forms shall be provided at actual cost by the Department of Justice.

The dealers involved in the transaction shall retain their copy of the interdealer transfer form or itemized bill of sale for a period of three years as a matter of record, and shall make them available for inspection by any law enforcement officer.

(b) Acquired in a nonjudicial sale, transfer, assignment, assignment for the benefit of creditors, or consignment of the assets or stock in trade, in bulk, or a substantial part thereof, of an industrial or commercial enterprise for purposes of voluntary dissolution or liquidation of the seller’s business, or for the purpose of disposing of an excessive quantity of personal property; or which has been acquired in a nonjudicial sale or transfer from an owner of his or her entire household of personal property, or a substantial part thereof; provided, the secondhand dealer retains in his or her place of business for a period of three years a copy of the bill of sale, receipt, inventory list, or other transfer document as a matter of record which shall be made available for inspection by any law enforcement officer; and provided further, that the secondhand dealer notifies the chief of police or the sheriff that exemption from reporting is being claimed under this subdivision. “Industrial or commercial enterprise” and “owner” as used in this subdivision do not include a secondhand dealer;

(c) Acquired in a sale made by any public officer in his or her official capacity, trustee in bankruptcy, executor, administrator, receiver, or public official acting under judicial process or authority, or which has been acquired in a sale made upon the execution of, or by virtue of, any process issued by a court, or under the provisions of Division 7 (commencing with Section 7101) of the Commercial Code;

(d) Acquired as the surplus property of the United States government or of a state, city, county, city and county, municipal corporation, or public district and which after requisition or acquisition by the United States government or by a state, city, county, city and county, municipal corporation, or public district has never thereafter been sold at retail; and

(e) Reported by a secondhand dealer as an acquisition or a purchase, or which has been reported as destroyed or otherwise disposed of, (1) to a state agency by the authority of any other law of this State; or (2) to a city, county, or city and county officer or agency by the authority of any other law of this State or a city, county, or city and county ordinance.

(f) Acquired by persons, firms, partnerships, or corporations who buy, sell, or trade precious metals, whether in the form of coins or commercial grade ingots, who: (1) are designated contract markets by or registered with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission under the Federal Commodities Exchange Act and acting pursuant thereto; or (2) infrequently conduct their business directly with members of the general public. As used in this subdivision, “infrequently” means occasional and without regularity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1229, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21629.5.

Notwithstanding Section 21629, the provisions of this article shall apply to any tangible personal property which has been acquired by a secondhand dealer with the understanding or expectation that such property would later be reacquired by the transferor or an agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 499, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21630.

(a) A secondhand dealer or coin dealer shall electronically transmit to CAPSS no later than the next business day after the date of transaction excluding weekends and holidays or, if not then possible due to an electrical, telecommunications, or other malfunction, as soon as reasonable thereafter, the report of acquisition of tangible personal property as required by Section 21628.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21628, submission of a tangible property acquisition report is not required if the report of an acquisition of the same property from the same customer has been submitted within the preceding 12 months.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 793, Sec. 6.   (AB 1751)   Effective September 29, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21631.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all tangible personal property that is found in the shop of a pawnbroker, secondhand dealer, or coin dealer, doing business under a California secondhand dealer’s license, shall be reported as required under subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 21628, including any additional information required by Section 21628 that is known by the reporting person, and shall be held as required under Section 21636 on forms as required under Section 21633. If no claim is made for the property for a period of 60 days after it is reported, the pawnbroker, secondhand dealer, or coin dealer may treat the property as property regularly acquired in the due course of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 647, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21634.

The chief of police or the sheriff who receives a report on a form filed pursuant to the provisions of this article shall daily submit the original to the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

21636.

(a) Every secondhand dealer and coin dealer shall retain in his or her possession for a period of 30 days all firearms reported under Section 21628.2. The 30-day holding period with respect to firearms shall commence with the date the report of its acquisition was made electronically to the Department of Justice by the secondhand dealer and coin dealer. The Department of Justice may for good cause authorize prior disposition of any firearms described in a specific report, provided that a secondhand dealer who disposes of firearms pursuant to that authorization shall report the sale thereof to the Department of Justice.

(b) During the 30-day holding period specified in subdivision (a),
 every secondhand dealer and coin dealer shall produce any firearm reported under Section 21628.2 for inspection by any peace officer or employee designated by the Department of Justice.

(c) Firearms subject to inspection as specified in subdivision (b) and firearms held in pawn that are stored off the business premises of the licensee shall, upon request for inspection, be produced at the licensee’s business premises within one business day of a request.

(d) Any person who conducts business as a secondhand dealer at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, outside the jurisdiction that issued the secondhand dealer license in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 21641, may be required to submit for
 inspection, as specified in subdivision (b), any firearm acquired at a gun show or event within 48 hours of the request of the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the gun show or event was conducted at a location specified by the local law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (AB 1993)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21636.1.

(a) Every secondhand dealer and coin dealer shall retain in his or her possession for a period of seven days all tangible personal property, as defined in Section 21627, reported pursuant to Sections 21628 and 21630. The seven-day holding period with respect to tangible personal property shall commence with the date the report of its acquisition was made to CAPSS.
